Utah statutes.
26-23-1.   Legal advice and representation for department.
(1)  The attorney general shall be the legal adviser for the department and
the executive director and shall defend them in all actions and proceedings
brought against either of them. The county attorney of the county in which a
cause of action arises or a public offense occurs shall bring any civil action
requested by the executive director to abate a condition which exists in
violation of the public health laws or standards, orders, and rules of the
department as provided in Section 26-23-6.
(2)  The district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction
shall prosecute for the violation of the public health laws or standards,
orders, and rules of the department as provided in Section 26-23-6.
(3)  If the county attorney or district attorney fails to act, the executive
director may bring any such action and shall be represented by the attorney
general or, with the approval of the attorney general, by special counsel.
